it: Il set di conga includeva diversi tipi di tamburi: Conga + tumba; Quinto + conga; Quinto + conga + tumba; Altro
pt-BR: Tipos de tambores incluídos no conjunto de congas: Conga + Tumba; Quinto + Conga; Quinto + Conga + Tumba; Outro
el: Σετ Conga που περιλαμβάνει τύπους τυμπάνων: Conga + Tumba; Quinto + Conga; Quinto + Conga + Tumba; Άλλο
es: El juego de congas incluyó diferentes tipos de tambores: Conga y tumba; Quinto y conga; Quinto, conga y tumba; Otro
ja: コンガセットに含まれるドラムタイプ: コンガ + トゥンバ; キント + コンガ; キント + コンガ + トゥンバ; その他
de: Im Conga-Set enthaltene Trommeltypen: Conga + Tumba; Quinto + Conga; Quinto + Conga + Tumba; Sonstige
bg-BG: Комплектът конга включва видове барабани: Конга + Тумба; Квинто + Конга; Квинто + Конга + Тумба; Други
fr: Types de tambours inclus dans l’ensemble de congas: Conga + Tumba; Quinto + Conga; Quinto + Conga + Tumba; Autre
vi: Các loại trống conga đi kèm trong bộ trống conga: Conga + Tumba; Quinto + Conga; Quinto + Conga + Tumba; Khác
ko: 콩가 세트에는 다양한 드럼 종류가 포함되어 있습니다.: 콩가 + 툼바; 킨토 + 콩가; 킨토 + 콩가 + 툼바; 기타
pl: Typy bębnów dołączone do zestawu kong: Conga + Tumba; Quinto + Conga; Quinto + Conga + Tumba; Inne
da: Conga-sættets inkluderede trommetyper: Conga + tumba; Quinto + conga; Quinto + conga + tumba; Andet
hu: Kongaszettben található dobtípusok: Conga + Tumba; Quinto + Conga; Quinto + Conga + Tumba; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vrste bobnov, vključene v komplet conga bobnov: Conga + Tumba; Quinto + Conga; Quinto + Conga + Tumba; Drugo
lt-LT: Įtraukti kongų rinkinio būgnų tipai: Konga + Tumba; Kinto + Konga; Kinto + Konga + Tumba; Kita
ro-RO: Tipuri de tobe incluse în setul de conga: Conga + Tumba; Quinto + Conga; Quinto + Conga + Tumba; Altele
zh-TW: 康加鼓組包含的鼓類型: Conga + Tumba; Quinto + Conga; Quinto + Conga + Tumba; 其他
en: Conga set included drum types: Conga + Tumba; Quinto + Conga; Quinto + Conga + Tumba; Other
sk-SK: Typy bubnov obsiahnuté v súprave Conga: Conga + Tumba; Quinto + Conga; Quinto + Conga + Tumba; Iné
zh-CN: 康加鼓套装包含的鼓型: 康加鼓 + 吞巴鼓; 昆托鼓 + 康加鼓; 昆托鼓 + 康加鼓 + 吞巴鼓; 其他
sv: Trumtyper i congasetet: Conga + tumba; Quinto + conga; Quinto + conga + tumba; Andra
cs: Typy bubnů, které jsou součástí sady conga: Conga + Tumba; Quinto + Conga; Quinto + Conga + Tumba; Jiné
pt-PT: Tipos de tambores incluídos no conjunto do conga: Conga + Tumba; Quinto + Conga; Quinto + Conga + Tumba; Outro
tr: Conga setine dâhil davul türleri: Konga + Tumba; Quinto + Konga; Quinto + Konga + Tumba; Diğer
nl: Congaset meegeleverde drumtypen: Conga + tumba; Quinto + conga; Quinto + conga + tumba; Overig
nb: Conga-sett inkludert trommetyper: Conga + tumba; Quinto + conga; Quinto + conga + tumba; Annet
hr-HR: Set konga uključuje vrste bubnjeva: Conga + Tumba; Quinto + Conga; Quinto + Conga + Tumba; Ostalo
th: ประเภทของกลองที่รวมอยู่ในชุดกลองคองกา: กลองคองก้าและกลองทุมบ้า; กวินโต้ + คองก้า; กวินโต้ + คองก้า + ทุมบ้า; อื่นๆ
ru: Типы барабанов в комплекте конг: Конга + Тумба; Квинто + Конга; Квинто + Конга + Тумба; Другое
fi: Conga-settiin sisältyvät rumputyypit: Conga + tumba; Quinto + conga; Quinto + conga + tumba; Muu